Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 1. Administration.

Collateral references. —

93 Am. Jur. 2d, Waters, § 1 et seq.

93 C.J.S., Waters, §§ 9-17

94 C.J.S., Waters, § 488 et seq.

Sec. 46.15.010.
Determination of water rights.

The Department of Natural Resources shall determine and adjudicate rights in the water of the state, and in its appropriation and distribution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For appropriation and use of water, see 11 AAC 93, art. 2.

For enforcement, see 11 AAC 93, art. 6.

For critical water management areas, see 11 AAC 93, art. 9.

Sec. 46.15.020.
Authority and duties of the commissioner.

The commissioner shall exercise all those powers and do all those acts necessary to carry out the provisions and objectives of this chapter. The commissioner may

subject to AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code), enter into contractual agreements necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter including agreements with federal, state, and local agencies;

apply for, accept, administer, and expend grants, gifts, and loans from the federal government and any other public or private sources for the purposes of this chapter, and adopt procedures and do acts not otherwise restricted by law which are necessary to qualify the state to receive grants, gifts, and loans;

establish a division of water in the Department of Natural Resources and assign to that division the responsibility for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

The commissioner shall

adopt procedural and substantive regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter, taking into consideration the responsibilities of the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS 46.03 and the Department of Fish and Game under AS 16;

develop and maintain a standardized procedure for processing applications and the issuance of authorizations, permits, and certifications under this chapter; shall keep a public record of all applications for permits and certificates and other documents filed in the commissioner’s office; shall record all permits and certificates and amendments and orders affecting them and shall index them in accordance with the source of the water and the name of the applicant or appropriator; shall require that temporary water use authorizations are valid only to the extent that the water withdrawal and use complies with applicable requirements of AS

16.05.871

; and shall make the record of applications, including temporary water use applications under AS

46.15.155

that have been accepted as complete, authorizations, permits, certificates, amendments, and orders affecting them available to the public on the Internet;

cooperate with, assist, advise, and coordinate plans with the federal, state, and local agencies, including local soil and water conservation districts, in matters relating to the appropriation, use, conservation, quality, disposal, or control of waters and activities related thereto;

prescribe fees or service charges for any public service rendered consistent with AS

37.10.050

—

37.10.058

, except that the department may charge under regulations adopted by the department an annual $50 administrative service fee to maintain the water management program and a water conservation fee under AS

46.15.035

;

before February 1 of each year, prepare a report describing the activities of the commissioner under AS

46.15.035

and

46.15.037

; the commissioner shall notify the legislature that the report is available; the report must include

information on the number of applications and appropriations for the removal of water from one hydrological unit to another that were requested and that were granted and on the amounts of water involved;

information on the number and location of sales of water conducted by the commissioner and on the volume of water sold;

recommendations of the commissioner for changes in state water law; and

a description of state revenue and expenses related to activities under AS 46.15.035 and

46.15.037

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 50 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 56 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 30 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 107 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 100 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 2002; am E.O. No. 107 § 42 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 § 37 (2008))

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For exploratory operations, see 11 AAC 87, art. 2.

For drilling of geothermal wells, see 11 AAC 87, art. 3.

For existing rights, see 11 AAC 93, art. 1.

For appropriation and use of water, see 11 AAC 93, art. 2.

For temporary water use, see 11 AAC 93, art. 4.

For preferred use, see 11 AAC 93, art. 5.

For enforcement, see 11 AAC 93, art. 6.

For appeals, see 11 AAC 93, art. 7.

For administrative basin-wide adjudication, see 11 AAC 93, art. 8.

For critical water management areas, see 11 AAC 93, art. 9.